Nevada, session 83, SB130.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 2. Chapter 624 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Board may issue a restricted license that authorizes
the holder to perform certain work for which a contractor’s
license is required, within the scope and monetary limit of the
restricted license, to a person who submits to the Board:
(a) An application containing any information required by the
Board by regulation;
(b) Any fees required for the issuance of the license
established by the Board by regulation; and
(c) Proof satisfactory to the Board that the person:
(1) Has not less than 2 years of experience in a trade,
which may include, without limitation:
(I) Work experience of a particular type or within a
particular classification;
(II) Alternative training in a program which is offered
at an accredited college or university, apprenticeship or equivalent
program accepted by the Board; or
(III) Completion of any other program or obtaining any
other qualification acceptable to the Board; and
(2) Completed, within the year immediately preceding the
date on which the application is submitted, a course in business
counseling or a similar curriculum which consists of a minimum
number of hours and any other requirements established by the
Board.
2. Before issuing a restricted license to an applicant, the
Board shall require the applicant to file with the Board a surety
bond or cash deposit in an amount determined by the Board by
regulation, which must be not less than $2,000.
3. A restricted license issued pursuant to this section is valid
for 2 years and may be renewed in accordance with the procedures
for the renewal of a restricted license established by the Board by
regulation. A person who has held a restricted license for a period
of 2 years or more may, in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto governing
the issuance of a contractor’s license that is not a restricted
license, apply for a contractor’s license that is not a restricted
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
license if the person is not the subject of any open or unresolved
complaints.
4. Except for the provisions of NRS 624.268 and except as
otherwise provided by the regulations adopted by the Board
pursuant to subsection 7, the provisions of NRS 624.240 to
624.288, inclusive, that apply to a contractor’s license that is not a
restricted license do not apply to a restricted license issued
pursuant to this section.
5. A restricted license issued pursuant to this section may
only be issued in a classification and subclassification prescribed
by the Board which:
(a) Authorizes the holder of the restricted license to perform
the remodeling and improvement of an existing, detached, stand-
alone single-family residence or single-family residential unit
within a structure that does not extend more than three stories
above the ground and one story below the ground; and
(b) Does not authorize the holder of the restricted license to
increase the existing enclosed space of the residential structure.
6. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the holder of a
restricted license issued pursuant to this section may enter into a
contract for a construction project that involves one or more
building trades or crafts that the Board may determine to be
appropriate, which must not include any building trade or craft
involving the performance of any work of a type described in
paragraph (b) or (c) of subsection 6 of NRS 624.031.
7. The Board shall adopt regulations necessary to provide for
the issuance and renewal of a restricted license pursuant to this
section. The regulations must:
(a) Establish the monetary limit for a restricted license, which
must be $7,000, including labor and materials, or a greater
amount that the Board determines to be appropriate.
(b) Set forth the required contents of an application for the
issuance or renewal of a restricted license and any additional
procedures for the issuance and renewal of a restricted license
that the Board determines to be necessary. The regulations must
not require an applicant for the issuance or renewal of a restricted
license to submit a financial statement prepared by a certified
public accountant pursuant to NRS 624.263 or 624.264.
(c) Establish reasonable fees for an application and for a
restricted license to be paid by applicants for the issuance or
renewal of a restricted license, which must not exceed the amount
of the fees set forth in NRS 624.280.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
(d) Set forth any additional requirements, restrictions or
conditions governing restricted licenses that the Board determines
to be necessary.
Sec. 3. The Board shall adopt the regulations necessary to
provide for the issuance and renewal of restricted licenses required
by section 2 of this act on or before January 1, 2027.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)